Idaho, session 2025, S1152.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 7, Title 58, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 58-708, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
58-708. JURISDICTION OVER CIVILIANS ON MILITARY INSTALLATIONS. (1)
Notwithstanding any current jurisdiction authorized by existing state or
federal statute, the state of Idaho hereby accepts the transfer of juris-
diction over adult and juvenile civilian offenders from the United States
on military lands or portions of military lands upon request from the United
States and delegates and directs the governor to ensure the legal completion
of such requests.
(2) Any person designated by the federal government may file a re-
quest with the governor for change in jurisdiction over adult and juvenile
civilian offenders on certain property or portions of a property held by the
United States and operated for military purposes, and the governor is hereby
authorized to accept such a request, ensuring adequate prosecution and ac-
cess to justice for adult and juvenile civilian offenders and protection for
victims of such offenders for offenses that occur on military lands in Idaho.
(3) A legally adequate request shall contain:
(a) A description of the property or portion of the property over which
the transfer of jurisdiction for adult and juvenile civilian offenders
is sought, described in terms legally sufficient to identify the bound-
aries of the property;
(b) A description of the existing jurisdiction over the property held
by the United States;
(c) A description of the jurisdiction over adult and juvenile civilian
offenders that the United States proposes to be transferred; and
(d) A statement by the requesting person that the person has the author-
ity to make the request on behalf of the United States.
(4) The transfer of jurisdiction shall not be exclusive jurisdiction,
shall not affect any other existing jurisdiction other than granting Idaho
courts jurisdiction, and shall not affect any other jurisdiction agree-
ments. The details of coordination efforts may be further negotiated in a
memorandum of understanding or law enforcement cooperation agreement be-
tween the United States military service operating the military lands and
the respective state or local law enforcement agency.


(5) The transfer of jurisdiction over adult and juvenile civilian of-
fenders shall become effective upon:
(a) The governor's filing of the documents signifying such request and
acceptance with the office of the Idaho secretary of state; and
(b) The governor's filing of the documents signifying such request and
acceptance with the applicable local offices of county land records.
(6) No transfer of jurisdiction authorized pursuant to this section
shall in any way restrict the state of Idaho's sole determination regarding
when an adult or juvenile civilian offender shall or shall not be prosecuted,
including a request to transfer a juvenile offender to adult court by the
appropriate prosecuting authority.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.